brailleTables/sd-pk-g2.ctb
# Sindhi (Pakistan) 6-dot Grade 2 (contracted) braille table
#
#-index-name: Sindhi, Pakistan, contracted
#-display-name: Sindhi contracted braille (Pakistan, Perso-Arabic)
#
#+language:sd
#+region:pk
#+type:literary
#+contraction:full
#+grade:2
#+direction:forward
#
#  Copyright (C) 2026
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
# SOURCE
#
# Every contraction below is taken from ڪامل سنڌي بريل درجو II by Riaz Hussain
# Memon - the Grade 2 book of the code ratified by the Sindhi Language Authority
# committee on 7 November 2016.  The letter and the word it stands for are read
# from the author's own manuscript; the braille is the Grade 1 cell for that
# letter, with the series prefix in front of it.
#
# The system has six series.  A contraction is the series prefix followed by one
# ordinary letter, and it stands for a whole word:
#
#   (no prefix)  a single letter standing alone as a word
#   dot 5        5-<letter>
#   dots 4 5     45-<letter>
#   dots 4 5 6   456-<letter>
#   dots 3 4 5 6 3456-<letter>
#   dot 6        6-<letter>
#
# and a seventh group, سنڌي اختصار, which abbreviates a phrase to its initial
# letters without any prefix.
#
# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
# STATUS - READ THIS BEFORE USING
#
# FORWARD ONLY, and NOT YET CONFIRMED IN USE.
#
# What is certain: the contraction list itself.  Each entry pairs a word with a
# letter exactly as the author's manuscript pairs them.
#
# What is NOT yet established is when a contraction may be used.  Every Grade 2
# braille code has placement rules - whether a contraction may begin a word, end
# one, stand alone, or cross a syllable boundary - and those rules are not stated
# in the material available.  This table therefore applies every contraction as a
# WHOLE WORD ONLY (`word` rules), which is the conservative choice: it will miss
# contractions a human transcriber would make, but it will not make one that is
# wrong inside a word.
#
# The section نقطي چار پنج ڇهه is headed "ڪل ۽ جز لفظي" - whole AND partial word -
# so some of its entries are meant to apply inside a word too.  Which ones is a
# question for Riaz Hussain Memon.  Until he answers, they are whole-word here.
#
# Back-translation is not attempted.  Do not use this table with `-b`.
# ------------------------------------------------------------------------
include sd-pk-g1-core.uti

# ۾ has a contraction of its own here — the letter م, dots 134 — where Grade 1
# spells it out as م ي ن.  That is the whole reason the shared rules sit in
# sd-pk-g1-core.uti rather than in sd-pk-g1.utb: liblouis cannot override a
# rule that an include has already defined.
word \x06FE 134
noback always \x06FD 1-3-24-1345

# --- ڪل لفظي مخفف — a single letter standing alone as a word  (45 entries) ---
word \x0627\x0633\x064A\x0646 1
word \x0628\x0647 12
word \x067B\x0647 26
word \x0680\x0644\x0648 23
word \x062A\x0648\x0647\x0627\x0646 2345
word \x067F\x0648 1256
word \x067D\x064A 246
word \x067A\x064A\x06AA 135
word \x062B\x0628\x0648\x062A 1456
word \x067E\x0631 1234
word \x062C\x0648 245
word \x0684\x0627\x06BB 356
word \x0686\x064A\x0648 14
word \x0687\x0648 16
word \x062D\x0627\x0635\x0644 156
word \x062E\x0627\x0644\x064A 1346
word \x062F\x0648\x0633\x062A 145
word \x068C\x064A\x0627\x0646 1236
word \x068F\x0633 34
word \x068A\x0627\x06AA\x067D\x0631 346
word \x068D\x06AA 256
word \x0630\x06AA\x0631 2346
word \x0631\x062D\x0645\x062A 1235
word \x0632\x0645\x064A\x0646 1356
word \x0633\x0631\x06AA\x0627\x0631 234
word \x0634\x0627\x064A\x062F 146
word \x0635\x0631\x0641 12346
word \x0636\x0627\x064A\x0639 1246
word \x0637\x0631\x062D 23456
word \x0638\x0644\x0645 123456
word \x063A\x0644\x0637 126
word \x0641\x0631\x0636 124
word \x06A6\x0644 235
word \x0642\x062F\x0631\x062A 12345
word \x06AA\x0627\x0641\x064A 13
word \x06AF\x0631\x0645\x064A 1245
word \x06AF\x0631\x0645 1245
word \x06B3\x0648\x067A 13456
word \x0644\x0627\x0621\x0650 123
# KNOWN DIVERGENCE.  ۾ has a Grade 2 contraction (م), but the Grade 1 table
# already spells it out as م ي ن with an `always` rule, and that rule wins here
# whichever opcode is used.  This table therefore leaves ۾ spelled out; the
# reference translator contracts it.  One entry of 205.
word \x0646\x0647 1345
word \x0645\x0627\x06BB\x06BE\x0648 3456
word \x0648\x064A\x0647\x0647 2456
word \x0647\x0627 125-125
word \x064A\x0627\x062F 24

# --- نقطي پنج سان شروع ٿيندڙ مخفف  (44 entries) ---
# prefix: dots 5
word \x0622\x0647\x064A 5-345
word \x0627\x0648\x0647\x0627\x0646 5-1
word \x0628\x064A\x0647\x0646 5-12
word \x067B\x0627\x0647\x0631 5-26
word \x0680\x0644\x0627\x0626\x064A 5-23
word \x062A\x0646\x0647\x0646 5-2345
word \x067F\x064A\x0646 5-1256
word \x067D\x0627\x0631\x064A\x0646 5-246
word \x067A\x0627\x0647\x064A\x0646 5-135
word \x062B\x0648\x0627\x0628 5-1456
word \x067E\x0646\x0647\x0646 5-1234
word \x062C\x064A\x062A\x0631 5-245
word \x0684\x0627\x06BB\x064A 5-356
word \x0686\x064A\x0627\x0626\x064A\x0646 5-14
word \x0687\x068F\x064A\x0646 5-16
word \x062D\x064A\x0631\x0627\x0646 5-156
word \x062E\x0648\x0634 5-1346
word \x062F\x0634\x0645\x0646 5-145
word \x068C\x0648\x0626\x0646 5-1236
word \x068F\x064A\x06A9\x0627\x0631 5-34
word \x068A\x0648\x0699\x0646 5-346
word \x0630\x0645\x064A\x0648\x0627\x0631 5-2346
word \x0631\x0627\x0646\x062F 5-1235
word \x0632\x0648\x0631 5-1356
word \x0633\x064A\x06A9\x0627\x0631 5-234
word \x0634\x0647\x0631 5-146
word \x0635\x0627\x062D\x0628 5-12346
word \x0636\x0631\x0648\x0631 5-1246
word \x0637\x0631\x0641 5-23456
word \x0638\x0627\x0647\x0631 5-123456
word \x0639\x0627\x0645 5-12356
word \x063A\x0644\x0637\x064A 5-126
word \x0641\x0631\x0642 5-124
word \x0642\x0631\x064A\x0628 5-12345
word \x06AA\x0646\x0647\x0646 5-13
word \x06AF\x0646\x062F 5-1245
word \x06B3\x0627\x0644\x06BE 5-13456
word \x0644\x06B3\x0646 5-123
word \x0645\x0646\x06BE\x0646 5-134
word \x0646\x062F\x064A\x0648\x0646 5-1345
word \x0648\x06BB\x0646 5-3456
word \x0648\x064A\x0646 5-2456
word \x0647\x0644\x0646 5-125-125
word \x064A\x0642\x064A\x0646 5-24

# --- نقطي چار پنج سان شروع ٿيندڙ مخفف  (18 entries) ---
# prefix: dots 4-5
word \x0622\x0647\x0633\x062A\x064A 45-345
word \x0680\x0631\x0633\x0627\x0646 45-23
word \x062A\x064A\x0626\x0646 45-2345
word \x067F\x064A\x0648\x0646 45-1256
word \x0687\x0627\x06AA\x0627\x06BB 45-16
word \x062D\x0631\x06AA\x062A 45-156
word \x062E\x064A\x0627\x0644 45-1346
word \x0633\x0646\x062F\x0633 45-234
word \x0634\x0627\x0646\x062F\x0627\x0631 45-146
word \x0635\x062D\x062A 45-12346
word \x0636\x0627\x0645\x0646 45-1246
word \x0637\x0631\x064A\x0642 45-23456
word \x0639\x0644\x0627\x0648\x0647 45-12356
word \x06A6\x064A\x0631\x06AF\x06BE\x064A\x0631 45-235
word \x0642\x0627\x0626\x062F 45-12345
word \x06AF\x068F\x064A\x0644 45-1245
word \x0645\x0639\x0644\x0648\x0645 45-134
word \x0648\x0627\x0642\x0639 45-2456

# --- نقطي چار پنج ڇهه سان شروع ٿيندڙ ڪل ۽ جز لفظي مخفف  (42 entries) ---
# prefix: dots 4-5-6
word \x0622\x06BB\x064A\x0646 456-345
word \x0627\x062E\x062A\x064A\x0627\x0631 456-1
word \x0628\x0646\x062F\x0648\x0628\x0633\x062A 456-12
word \x0680\x0627\x0626\x064A\x0646 456-23
word \x062A\x06AA\x0644\x064A\x0641 456-2345
word \x067F\x06AA\x0627\x0648\x067D 456-1256
word \x067D\x06AA\x0631 456-246
word \x067A\x0647\x0631\x0627\x0621\x064F 456-135
word \x067E\x064A\x0627\x0631 456-1234
word \x062C\x0646\x0647\x0646 456-245
word \x0684\x0645\x0627\x0631 456-356
word \x0686\x0648\x0646 456-14
word \x0687\x068F\x064A 456-16
word \x062D\x0627\x0636\x0631 456-156
word \x062E\x0631\x0627\x0628 456-1346
word \x062F\x0639\x0648\x062A 456-145
word \x068C\x0631\x062A\x064A 456-1236
word \x068F\x0633\x0646 456-34
word \x068A\x064A\x0684\x0627\x0631 456-346
word \x068D\x0646\x06AF 456-256
word \x0630\x062E\x064A\x0631\x0648 456-2346
word \x0631\x0648\x0634\x0646 456-1235
word \x0632\x0645\x0627\x0646 456-1356
word \x0633\x064A\x0646\x06AF\x0627\x0631 456-234
word \x0634\x0631\x0648\x0639 456-146
word \x0635\x0648\x0631\x062A 456-12346
word \x0636\x0645\x0627\x0646\x062A 456-1246
word \x0637\x0627\x0644\x0628 456-23456
word \x0639\x0628\x0627\x062F\x062A 456-12356
word \x063A\x0645\x06AF\x064A\x0646 456-126
word \x0641\x0631\x0645\x0627\x0646 456-124
word \x06A6\x064A\x0631\x0627\x0626\x064A\x0646 456-235
word \x0642\x0627\x0628\x0644 456-12345
word \x06AA\x0645\x0627\x0621\x0650 456-13
word \x06AF\x0646\x062C\x0627\x0626\x0634 456-1245
word \x06B3\x062C\x0647\x0647 456-13456
word \x0645\x0646\x062C\x0647\x0647 456-134
word \x0646\x0647\x0627\x064A\x062A 456-1345
word \x0627\x06B3\x0648\x0627\x06BB 456-3456
word \x0648\x064A\x06AA\x0631 456-2456
word \x0647\x0645\x062F\x0631\x062F 456-125-125
word \x064A\x0627\x062F\x06AF\x0627\x0631 456-24

# --- نقطي ٽي چار پنج ڇهه سان شروع ٿيندڙ مخفف  (28 entries) ---
# prefix: dots 3-4-5-6
word \x0622\x0648\x0627\x0632 3456-345
word \x062A\x0646\x062F\x0631\x0633\x062A 3456-2345
word \x067F\x0699\x06AA\x0646 3456-1256
word \x067D\x0699\x0646 3456-246
word \x067A\x06AA\x0631\x0627\x0626\x0646 3456-135
word \x067E\x0627\x0644\x06BB\x0647\x0627\x0631 3456-1234
word \x0687\x068F\x0627\x0626\x064A\x0646 3456-16
word \x062D\x0641\x0627\x0638\x062A 3456-156
word \x062E\x0648\x0634\x062D\x0627\x0644 3456-1346
word \x068C\x06AA\x0627\x0631 3456-1236
word \x068F\x06A9\x0648\x0626\x064A\x0646 3456-34
word \x0631\x064A\x062C\x0627\x0626\x064A\x0646 3456-1235
word \x0632\x064A\x0627\x0631\x062A 3456-1356
word \x0633\x062F\x0627\x0626\x064A\x0646 3456-234
word \x0634\x0627\x0647\x0648\x06AA\x0627\x0631 3456-146
word \x0635\x062D\x062A\x0645\x0646\x062F 3456-12346
word \x0635\x062D\x062A\x0645\x0646\x062F\x064A 3456-12346
word \x0636\x0639\x064A\x0641 3456-1246
word \x0637\x0627\x0642\x062A\x0648\x0631 3456-23456
word \x0639\x0627\x0644\x064A\x0634\x0627\x0646 3456-12356
word \x063A\x0644\x0627\x0636\x062A 3456-126
word \x0642\x0631\x0627\x0631\x062F\x0627\x062F 3456-12345
word \x06AA\x0627\x0631\x0648\x0628\x0627\x0631 3456-13
word \x06B3\x0648\x0644\x0647\x0647 3456-13456
word \x0644\x06B3\x0627\x062A\x0627\x0631 3456-123
word \x0645\x062E\x062A\x0644\x0641 3456-134
word \x0646\x0645\x0648\x0646\x0627 3456-1345
word \x0648\x0627\x067E\x0633 3456-2456

# --- نقطي ڇهه سان شروع ٿيندڙ مخفف  (3 entries) ---
# prefix: dots 6
word \x0628\x062D\x0631\x062D\x0627\x0644 6-12
word \x062C\x064A\x062A\x0648\x06BB\x064A\x06AA 6-245
word \x062D\x0627\x0644\x0627\x0646\x06AA\x0647 6-156
